Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2937
Trace or tracing, defined.

Trace or tracing means the epidemiological investigative process of determining the origin and movements of animals, animal products, and possible vectors that may be involved in the spread or transmissibility of a disease agent.

Laws 2020, LB344, § 37.